fr: Caractéristiques du répartiteur/commutateur: Prise en charge de la 3D; Extraction audio; Prise en charge audio; En cascade; Gestion EDID; Connectivité LAN Ethernet; Extension IR; Amplification du signal; Autre
zh-CN: 分配器/切换器功能: 支持 3D; 音频提取; 音频支持; 可级联; EDID 管理; 以太网 LAN 连接; 红外线延长系统; 信号扩增; 其他
en: Splitter/Switch features: 3D support; Audio extraction; Audio support; Cascadable; EDID management; Ethernet LAN connectivity; IR extension; Signal amplification; Other
pt-PT: Recursos de divisor/switch: Suporte 3D; Extração de áudio; Suporte de áudio; Em cascata; Gestão de EDID; Conectividade LAN Ethernet; Extensão IR; Amplificação de sinal; Outro
it: Funzionalità di divisione/commutazione: Supporto 3D; Estrazione audio; Supporto audio; A cascata; Gestione EDID; Connettività LAN Ethernet; IR estensibile; Amplificazione del segnale; Altro
lt-LT: Karpymo / skirstymo įrangos funkcijos: 3D palaikymas; Garso atskyrimas; Garso palaikymas; Kaskadinis; EDID valdymas; Eterneto LAN ryšys; IR plėtinys; Signalo stiprinimas; Kita
pl: Charakterystyka rozdzielacza/przełącznika: Obsługa 3D; Ekstrakcja dźwięku; Obsługa dźwięku; Kaskadowy; Zarządzanie EDID; Łączność Ethernet w sieci LAN; Przedłużenie IR; Wzmocnienie sygnału; Inne
pt-BR: Recursos de splitter/switch: Suporte 3D; Extração de áudio; Suporte de áudio; Em cascata; Gerenciamento de EDID; Conectividade LAN Ethernet; Extensão IR; Amplificação de sinal; Outro
nb: Fordeler-/bryterfunksjoner: 3D-støtte; Lydekstraksjon; Lydstøtte; Kaskaderbar; EDID-håndtering; Ethernet LAN-tilkobling; IR-forlengelse; Signalforsterkning; Annet
sl-SI: Funkcije razdelilnika/preklopnika: 3D podpora; Ekstrakcija zvoka; Avdio podpora; Kaskadno; Upravljanje EDID; Ethernet LAN povezljivost; IR razširitev; Ojačitev signala; Drugo
bg-BG: Функции за сплитер/превключвател: 3D поддръжка; Извличане на аудио; Аудио поддръжка; Каскаден; Управление на EDID; Ethernet LAN свързаност; Удължаване на IR; Усилване на сигнала; Други
fi: Haaroittimen/kytkimen ominaisuudet: 3D-tuki; Äänen poiminta; Audiotuki; Ketjutettava; EDID-hallinta; Ethernet LAN -liitäntä; IR-laajennus; Signaalin vahvistus; Muu
nl: Kenmerken splitter-/schakelaar: 3D-ondersteuning; Audio-extractie; Audio-ondersteuning; Schakelbaar; EDID-beheer; Ethernet LAN-verbinding; IR-extensie; Signaalversterking; Andere
sv: Detaljer för splitter/omkopplare: 3D-stöd; Ljudextraktion; Ljudstöd; Kaskadbar; EDID-hantering; Ethernet LAN-anslutning; IR-förlängning; Signalförstärkning; Övrigt
cs: Vlastnosti splitteru/switche: Podpora 3D; Extrakce zvuku; Podpora zvuku; Kaskádovité; Správa EDID; Připojení k síti Ethernet LAN; Rozšíření IR; Zesílení signálu; Jiné
es: Características del divisor/interruptor: Compatible con 3D; Extracción de audio; Soporte de audio; Conexión en cascada; Organización de EDID; Conectividad LAN Ethernet; Extensión infrarroja; Amplificación de señal; Otros
el: Χαρακτηριστικά διαχωριστή/διακόπτη: Υποστήριξη 3D; Εξαγωγή ήχου; Υποστήριξη ήχου; Cascadable; Διαχείριση EDID; Συνδεσιμότητα Ethernet LAN; Επέκταση IR; Ενίσχυση σήματος; Άλλο
tr: Ayırıcı/Anahtar özellikleri: 3D destekli; Ses çekme; Ses desteği; Basamaklandırılabilir; EDID yönetimi; Ethernet LAN bağlantısı; IR uzantısı; Sinyal yükseltme; Diğer
ja: スプリッタ/スイッチ機能: 3D対応; 音声抽出; 音声サポート; カスケード式; EDID管理; イーサネットLAN接続; IR延長; 信号増幅; その他
zh-TW: 分路器/開關特點: 支援 3D; 音訊擷取; 音訊支援; 可串聯; EDID 管理; 乙太網路 LAN 連接; 紅外線擴展; 訊號放大; 其他
sk-SK: Funkcie rozdeľovača/prepínača: Podpora 3D; Extrakcia zvuku; Podpora zvuku; Kaskádovateľný; Správa EDID; Ethernet LAN pripojenie; IR predĺženie; Zosilnenie signálu; Iné
ko: 분배기/스위치 기능: 3D 지원; 오디오 추출; 오디오 지원; 캐스케이드 가능; EDID 관리; 이더넷 LAN 연결; IR 확장; 신호 증폭; 기타
ru: Характеристики сплиттера/коммутатора: Поддержка 3D; Извлечение звука; Поддержка аудио; Каскадируемый; Управление EDID; Подключение к локальной сети Ethernet; ИК-расширение; Усиление сигнала; Другое
ro-RO: Caracteristici splitter/comutator: Suport 3D; Extracție audio; Suport audio; În cascadă; Managementul EDID; Conectivitate Ethernet LAN; Extensie IR; Amplificarea semnalului; Altele
th: คุณลักษณะของตัวแยกสัญญาณ/สวิตช์: รองรับ 3 มิติ; การแยกเสียง; รองรับเสียง; ต่อพ่วงได้; การจัดการ EDID; การเชื่อมต่ออีเทอร์เน็ตแลน; ส่วนขยาย IR; การขยายสัญญาณ; อื่นๆ
da: Splitter-/switchfunktioner: 3D-understøttelse; Lydudtræk; Lydunderstøttelse; Kan kaskaderes; EDID-styring; Ethernet LAN-forbindelse; IR-forlængelse; Signalforstærkning; Andet
de: Splitter/Switch-Funktionen: 3D-Unterstützung; Audioextraktion; Audiounterstützung; Kaskadierbar; EDID-Management; Ethernet-LAN-Konnektivität; IR-Erweiterung; Signalverstärkung; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Značajke razdjelnika/prekidača: Podrška za 3D; Ekstrakcija zvuka; Podržavanje zvuka; Kaskadno; EDID upravljanje; Ethernet LAN povezivost; IR produžetak; Pojačanje signala; Ostalo
hu: Elosztó/kapcsoló funkciói: 3D-támogatás; Hangkinyerés; Hangtámogatás; Kaszkádolható; EDID-kezelés; Ethernet LAN csatlakozás; IR kiterjesztés; Jelerősítés; Egyéb
vi: Tính năng bộ chia quang/công tắc: Hỗ trợ 3D; Trích xuất âm thanh; Hỗ trợ âm thanh; Có thể xếp tầng; Quản lý EDID; Kết nối mạng LAN Ethernet; Nối dài IR; Khuếch đại tín hiệu; Khác